Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 12
CANVASS OF VOTES

31-10-1201. Returns - canvass.

The returns of all municipal elections shall be made to the clerk of the municipality. The clerk shall request the assistance of the mayor of the municipality in conducting the canvass of votes. If there is no mayor or if the mayor has been a candidate at the election, the clerk shall appoint a municipal judge, a member of the election commission, or a person who is qualified to be an election judge and who did not serve as an election judge in the election as an assistant. No later than ten days after the election, the clerk, in the presence of the assistant, shall open the returns and make out abstracts of votes for each office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1065, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1712, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 857, § 10, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1001 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-10-1202. Imperfect returns.

When the clerk and his assistant find that the returns from any precinct do not strictly conform to the requirements of law in making, certifying, and returning the same, the votes cast in such precinct nevertheless shall be canvassed and counted if such returns are sufficiently explicit to enable such persons authorized to canvass votes and returns to determine therefrom how many votes were cast for the several candidates.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1066, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1002 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1203. Corrections.

If, upon proceeding to canvass the votes, it clearly appears to the clerk and his assistant that in any statement produced to them certain matters are omitted which should have been inserted or that any mistakes which are merely clerical exist, they shall cause the statement to be sent to the precinct judges from whom they were received to have the same corrected. The judges of election, when so demanded, shall make such correction as the facts of the case require but shall not change or alter any decision made before by them. The clerk and his assistant may adjourn from day to day for the purpose of obtaining and receiving such statement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1066, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1003 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1204. Tie - lots - notice to candidates.

If any two or more candidates receive an equal and the highest number of votes for the same office and if there are not enough offices remaining for all such candidates, the clerk and his assistant shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected. Reasonable notice shall be given to such candidates of the time when such election will be so determined.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1066, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1004 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1205. Statement - certificates of election.

The clerk shall immediately make out statements from the abstract of votes which shall show the names of the candidates and the whole number of votes given to each, distinguishing the several precincts in which they were given. The clerk and his assistant shall certify such statement to be correct and subscribe their names thereto. They shall thereupon determine which persons have been by the greatest number of votes duly elected and shall endorse and subscribe on such statements a certificate of their determination.

(1.5) In any election in a municipality that utilizes four-year overlapping terms of office for members of the governing body as provided in sections 31-4-107 (3) and 31-4-301 (5), any available four-year terms of office shall be awarded to the candidate or the candidates receiving the highest number of votes. The term of office of the candidate or candidates receiving the next highest vote total or totals shall be shortened as provided in sections 31-4-107 (3) and 31-4-301 (5).

The clerk shall record in his or her office, in a book to be kept for that purpose, each such certified statement and determination and shall, without delay, make out and transmit to each of the persons declared to be elected a certificate of election, certified by the clerk under his or her seal of office. The clerk shall also, without delay, cause a copy of the certified statement and determination to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality or posted when no newspaper is published within the municipality. The clerk shall also file a copy with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, which shall post the same on its official website in a form that is readily accessible to the public. The secretary of state shall provide a hyperlink to such posting on his or her official website.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1066, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1.5) added, p. 1712, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1.5) amended, p. 1769, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (HB 16-1012), ch. 19, p. 44, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1005 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1206. Fees of municipal judge.

Each municipal judge appointed to assist the clerk in opening the returns of any municipal election and making abstracts of the votes cast thereat, as required in this article, shall receive for such services the sum of ten dollars for each day in which he is actually engaged therein, to be paid by the municipality in which such service is rendered.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1066, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1006 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1207. Recount.

The municipal clerk shall conduct a recount of the votes cast in any election if it appears, as evidenced by the survey of returns, that the difference between the highest number of votes cast in the election and the next highest number of votes cast in the election is less than or equal to one-half of one percent of the highest number of votes cast in the election. Any recount conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be completed no later than the fifteenth day following the election and shall be paid for by the governing body. The clerk shall give notice of the recount to all candidates and, in the case of a ballot issue or question, to any petition representatives identified pursuant to sections 31-2-221 (1), 31-4-502 (1)(a)(I), and 31-11-106 (2) that are affected by the result of the election. Such notice shall be given by certified mail, by posting such notice in three public places within the municipal limits, or by other means reasonably expected to notify the affected candidates or petition representatives. Any affected candidate or petition representative is allowed to be present during and observe the recount.

Whenever a recount of the votes cast in an election is not required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any interested party, including a candidate for office or the petition representatives for a ballot issue or question, may submit to the clerk a written request for a recount at the expense of the interested party making the request. This request shall be filed with the clerk within ten days after the election. Before conducting the recount, the clerk shall give notice of the recount in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall determine the cost of the recount, shall notify the interested party that requested the recount of such cost, and shall collect the cost of conducting the recount from such interested party. The interested party that requested the recount shall pay on demand the cost of the recount to the clerk. The funds paid to the clerk for the recount shall be placed in escrow for payment of all expenses incurred in the recount. If, after the recount, the result of the election is reversed in favor of the interested party that requested the recount or if the amended election count is such that a recount otherwise would have been required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the payment for expenses shall be refunded to the interested party who paid them. Any recount of votes conducted pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be completed no later than the fifteenth day after the election.

The clerk shall be responsible for conducting the recount and shall be assisted by those persons who assisted in preparing the official abstract of votes. If the person cannot participate in the recount, another person shall be appointed as provided in section 31-10-1201. The clerk may appoint additional persons qualified to be the election judges who did not serve as judges in the election as assistants in conducting the recount. Persons assisting in the conduct of the recount shall be compensated as provided in section 31-10-1206.

The clerk may require the production of any documentary evidence regarding the legality of any vote cast or counted and may correct the survey of returns in accordance with the clerk's findings based on the evidence presented.

In precincts using paper or electronic ballots, the recounts shall be of the ballots cast, and the votes shall be tallied on sheets other than those used at the election. In precincts using voting machines, the recount shall be of the votes tabulated on the voting machines, and separate tally sheets shall be used for each machine.

After a recount conducted pursuant to this section has been completed, the clerk shall notify the governing body of the results of the recount, shall make a certificate of election for each candidate who received the highest number of votes for an office for which a recount was conducted, and shall deliver the certificate to such candidate.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1712, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended and (6) added, p. 797, § 19, effective August 2.

L. 2015:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 15-1130), ch. 230, p. 857, § 11, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1130, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.